Utah statutes.
32A-1-117.   Department may sue and be sued.
The department may be sued and may institute or defend proceedings in any
court of law or otherwise in the name of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage
Control as though the department were incorporated under that name or title.
Proceedings may not be taken against the commission or in the names of the
members of the commission.
